Wyoming, session 2026, HB0006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 27-3-102(a)(v), 27-3-304, 27-3-601(a)
and 27-14-802(b) are amended to read:

27-3-102. Definitions generally.

HB0006

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0141
(a) Except as otherwise provided, as used in this
act:

(v) "Commission" means the unemployment
reemployment insurance commission of Wyoming within the
department of workforce services;

27-3-304. Maximum payment.

(a) Except as provided by W.S. 27-3-316 and
subsection (b) of this section, the maximum amount of
benefits payable to any eligible individual person in a
benefit year shall not exceed twenty-six (26) twenty (20)
times his the person's weekly benefit or thirty percent
(30%) of his the person's wages payable for insured work in
his the person's base period, whichever is less. This
amount shall be computed to the next higher multiple of his
the person's weekly benefit.

(b) The maximum amount of benefits payable to any
eligible person attached to regular work in a benefit year
shall not exceed twenty-six (26) times the person's weekly
benefit amount or thirty percent (30%) of the person's
HB0006

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0141
wages payable for insured work in the person's base period,
whichever is less. For purposes of this subsection,
"eligible person attached to regular work" means a person
who is a seasonal worker at the person's regular place of
employment or a worker who is temporarily laid off but who
expects to return to the regular place of employment within
the following twelve (12) month period.

27-3-601. Reemployment insurance commission created;
composition; terms; vacancies; salary; chairman; quorum;
removal; office; seal.

(a) The unemployment reemployment insurance
commission of Wyoming is created within the department of
workforce services and shall consist of three (3) members
serving a term of six (6) years each. Appointments,
vacancies and expiration of terms shall be in accordance
with W.S. 28-12-101 through 28-12-103. A member shall not
hold any state office or serve as an officer or on a
committee of any political organization during the term of
membership. No more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the
members shall be of the same political party.

HB0006

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0141
27-14-802. Rulemaking power; fees; state's average
wages; vocational rehabilitation; contracts with clerks of
district court.

(b) Before the last day of each quarter in each year,
the department shall estimate the average monthly and
weekly wage for the twelve (12) months preceding the
quarter, based on unemployment reemployment insurance
commission information and other available statistics.

Section 2. There is appropriated eighteen thousand
dollars ($18,000.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming
department of workforce services for purposes of updating
and administering the Wyoming unemployment insurance
system. This appropriation shall be for the period
beginning with the effective date of this section and
ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2027.

HB0006

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0141
Section 3. This act shall apply to all unemployment
claims filed on and after January 1, 2027.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2027.

(b) Sections 2 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0006